Illinois, session 104th, HB1620.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 4-110.1 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/4-110.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-110.1)7    Sec. 4-110.1. Occupational disease disability pension. 8The General Assembly finds that service in the fire department 9requires firefighters in times of stress and danger to perform 10unusual tasks; that firefighters are subject to exposure to 11extreme heat or extreme cold in certain seasons while 12performing their duties; that they are required to work in the 13midst of and are subject to heavy smoke fumes, and 14carcinogenic, poisonous, toxic or chemical gases from fires; 15and that these conditions exist and arise out of or in the 16course of employment.17    An active firefighter with 5 or more years of creditable 18service who is found, pursuant to Section 4-112, unable to 19perform his or her duties in the fire department by reason of 20heart disease, stroke, tuberculosis, amyotrophic lateral 21sclerosis (ALS), or any disease of the lungs or respiratory 22tract, resulting from service as a firefighter, is entitled to 23an occupational disease disability pension during any period   HB1620- 2 -LRB104 08517 RPS 18569 b1of such disability for which he or she has no right to receive 2salary.3    Any active firefighter who has completed 5 or more years 4of service and is unable to perform his or her duties in the 5fire department by reason of a disabling cancer, which 6develops or manifests itself during a period while the 7firefighter is in the service of the fire department, shall be 8entitled to receive an occupational disease disability benefit 9during any period of such disability for which he or she does 10not have a right to receive salary. In order to receive this 11occupational disease disability benefit, (i) the type of 12cancer involved must be a type which may be caused by exposure 13to heat, radiation or a known carcinogen as defined by the 14International Agency for Research on Cancer and (ii) the 15cancer must (and is rebuttably presumed to) arise as a result 16of service as a firefighter.17    A firefighter who enters the service after August 27, 1971 18shall be examined by one or more practicing physicians 19appointed by the board. If the examination discloses 20impairment of the heart, lungs or respiratory tract, or the 21existence of any cancer, the firefighter shall not be entitled 22to the occupational disease disability pension unless and 23until a subsequent examination reveals no such impairment or 24cancer.25    The occupational disease disability pension shall be equal 26to the greater of (1) 65% of the salary attached to the rank   HB1620- 3 -LRB104 08517 RPS 18569 b1held by the firefighter in the fire service at the time of his 2or her removal from the municipality's fire department payroll 3or (2) the retirement pension that the firefighter would be 4eligible to receive if he or she retired (but not including any 5automatic annual increase in that retirement pension).6    The firefighter is also entitled to a child's disability 7benefit of $20 a month for each natural or legally adopted 8unmarried child less than age 18 dependent upon the 9firefighter for support. The total child's disability benefit 10when added to the occupational disease disability pension 11shall not exceed 75% of the firefighter's salary at the time of 12the grant of occupational disease disability pension.13    The occupational disease disability pension is payable to 14the firefighter during the period of the disability. If the 15disability ceases before the death of the firefighter, the 16disability pension payable under this Section shall also cease 17and the firefighter thereafter shall receive such pension 18benefits as are provided in accordance with other provisions 19of this Article.20    If a firefighter dies while still disabled and receiving a 21disability pension under this Section, the disability pension 22shall continue to be paid to the firefighter's survivors in 23the sequence provided in Section 4-114. A pension previously 24granted under Section 4-114 to a survivor of a firefighter who 25died while receiving a disability pension under this Section 26shall be deemed to be a continuation of the pension provided   HB1620- 4 -LRB104 08517 RPS 18569 b1under this Section and shall be deemed to be in the nature of 2worker's occupational disease compensation payments. The 3changes to this Section made by this amendatory Act of 1995 are 4intended to be retroactive and are not limited to persons in 5service on or after its effective date.6    The child's disability benefit shall terminate if the 7disability ceases while the firefighter is alive or when the 8child or children attain age 18 or marry, whichever event 9occurs first, except that benefits payable on account of a 10child under this Section shall not be reduced or terminated by 11reason of the child's attainment of age 18 if he or she is then 12dependent by reason of a physical or mental disability but 13shall continue to be paid as long as such dependency 14continues. Individuals over the age of 18 and adjudged as a 15disabled person pursuant to Article XIa of the Probate Act of 161975, except for persons receiving benefits under Article III 17of the Illinois Public Aid Code, shall be eligible to receive 18benefits under this Act.19(Source: P.A. 93-1090, eff. 3-11-05.) 20    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 21Section 8.49 as follows: 22    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)23    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 248 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for   HB1620- 5 -LRB104 08517 RPS 18569 b1the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 2Act of the 104th General Assembly.